Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1830YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 217 Section 1. Section 514F.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. A utilization review organization or 3 a health carrier shall not require prior authorization for 4 health care services that are recommended by a covered personâs 5 health care provider based on the national comprehensive cancer 6 network protocols. 7